Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 79.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-179
Domestication.

(ULLCA 1010) (a) A foreign limited liability
company may become a limited liability company pursuant to this section, sections
21-180 to 21-182, and a plan of domestication, if:

(1) the foreign limited
liability company's governing statute authorizes the domestication;

(2) the domestication
is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing
statute; and

(3)
the foreign limited liability company complies with its governing statute
in effecting the domestication.

(b) A limited liability company may become a foreign
limited liability company pursuant to this section, sections 21-180 to 21-182,
and a plan of domestication, if:

(1) the foreign limited liability company's governing
statute authorizes the domestication;

(2) the domestication is not prohibited by the law
of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

(3) the foreign limited
liability company complies with its governing statute in effecting the domestication.

(c) A plan of domestication
must be in a record and must include:

(1) the name of the domesticating company before domestication
and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(2) the name of the domesticated
company after domestication and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(3) the terms and conditions
of the domestication, including the manner and basis for converting interests
in the domesticating company into any combination of money, interests in the
domesticated company, and other consideration; and

(4) the organizational documents
of the domesticated company that are, or are proposed to be, in a record.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 79.